Utah statutes.
31A-9-105.   General corporate powers and procedures.

(1)  Section 16-10a-302 applies to the general powers of fraternals.

(2) Section 16-6a-304 applies to ultra vires issues in fraternals.

(3)  Subsection 31A-5-104(3) applies to the omission of a seal in a fraternal.

(4)  Sections 16-6a-705 and 16-6a-707 apply to waiver of notice and consent to action without a meeting in a fraternal.

(5)  Subsection 31A-5-104(5) applies to the power to hold assets as a trustee in a fraternal.



Amended by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

